Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
General Provisions

§ 21-21-1.
Marshal or chief of police; duties; bond.

The marshal or chief of police shall be the chief law enforcement officer of the municipality and shall have control and supervision of all police officers employed by said municipality. The marshal or chief of police shall be an ex officio constable within the boundaries of the municipality, and he shall perform such other duties as shall be required of him by proper ordinance. Before performing any of the duties of his office, the marshal or chief of police shall give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in an amount to be determined by the municipal governing authority (which shall be not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00)). The premium upon said bond shall be paid from the municipal treasury. If any marshal or chief of police shall fail to perform any of the duties of his office, it shall be the duty of the district attorney or county attorney upon receiving notice thereof to immediately file quo warranto proceedings against such official.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable to all municipalities of this state, whether operating under a code charter, special charter, or the commission form of government, except in cases of conflict between the provisions of this section and the provisions of the special charter of a municipality, or the law governing the commission form of government, in which case of conflict the provisions of the special charter or the statutes relative to the commission form of government shall control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2997; 1906, § 3394; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5922; 1930, § 2531; 1942, §§ 3374-100, 3374-111; Laws, 1950, chs. 505, 491, §§ 100, 111; Laws, 1952, ch. 364, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 31; Laws, 1988, ch. 488, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 30, 1988).

§ 21-21-3.
Police and night marshals.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority to employ, regulate and support a sufficient police force or night marshals, to define the duties thereof, and to furnish and supply all suitable and necessary equipment therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2963; 1906, § 3359; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5856; 1930, § 2436; 1942, § 3374-145; Laws, 1950, ch 491, § 145, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-21-5.
Purchasing dogs for use of police department.

The governing authorities of any municipality in the state are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to purchase by negotiation or otherwise, any breed of dogs suitable for law enforcement purposes, and pay for same out of the proceeds derived from tax levies made for their support and maintenance. Said dogs may be furnished to the police or police department of said municipality to be used by them in the enforcement of the laws of said municipality and the State of Mississippi. The governing authorities may also appropriate and pay monthly such amounts as may be necessary to maintain and care for said law enforcement dogs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-145.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 542, § 1.

§ 21-21-7.
Peace officers attending training schools; expenses.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority, in their discretion, to pay the expenses of any municipal peace or police officer which said officer incurs in attending any recognized training school for peace and law enforcement officers. Such governing authorities are further authorized and empowered to pay the salaries of such municipal peace and police officers during the time when such officers are attending such training schools. This section shall also apply to any other municipal officer or employee attending any recognized training school beneficial to his particular employment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-167; Laws, 1948, ch 387; Laws, 1950, ch 491, § 167, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-21-9.
Medical and hospital care for injured policemen.

In all municipalities of this state maintaining a police department, the personnel of which department is actively and exclusively engaged in police duty, the governing authorities of such municipality may pay out of the general fund of said municipality reasonable hospital and medical expenses for any member of said police department on account of any occupational disease contracted or for any accident sustained by said member by reason of his service or discharge of his duty in said department. The governing authorities of such city shall be the sole judge as to whether such illness or such injury was contracted or sustained in the line of duty of any such employee, and the reasonableness of said expenses.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 420; Laws, 1956, ch 396.

§ 21-21-11.
Purchase of certain insurance for police; payment of premiums.

The governing authorities of any municipality having a population in excess of 140,000 people by virtue of the 1960 census are hereby authorized to purchase insurance coverage to protect members of the police force working under the direction of the municipal authorities, against any suit or claims growing out of any action of such policemen guilty of false arrest, false imprisonment, false or improper service of process, malicious prosecution or any other claim resulting from such officers’ performance of official duties.

Such municipal authorities shall have the right to pay, out of the general fund of such municipality any premiums which may become due on the aforesaid insurance policies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-151.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1971).